Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska23-3511
Tax levy; limitation;
purpose.

The county board may levy
a tax each year of not to exceed three and five-tenths cents on each one hundred
dollars upon the taxable value of all the taxable property in such county
for the purpose of acquiring, remodeling, improving, equipping, maintaining,
and operating a facility as provided by section 23-3501.
In counties having a population of not more than seven thousand inhabitants, such tax shall not exceed seven
cents on each one hundred dollars of the taxable value.

Laws 1947, c. 61, § 2, p. 196;

Laws 1953, c. 287, § 44, p. 957;

Laws 1963, c. 114, § 11, p. 453;

Laws 1967, c. 121, § 11, p. 392;

Laws 1973, LB 20, § 1;

Laws 1979, LB 187, § 104;

Laws 1991, LB 798, § 3;

R.S.Supp.,1991, § 23-343.11;

Laws 1992, LB 719A, § 112;

Laws 1996, LB 1085, § 41;

Laws 1996, LB 1114, § 48;

Laws 2012, LB995, § 8.
April 6, 2012